test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Num-njolj_gt-norm.yaml
  Numeral - нёль: # Ordinary numerals - full paradigm including MNW 'four/neljä'
     нёль+Num+Card+Abs: нёль
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom: нёль
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Acc: [нёль, нёльсӧ]
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen: нёльлӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl: нёльлысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat: нёльлы
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr: нёльӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Com: нёлькӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Car: нёльтӧг
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Cns: нёльла
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine: нёльын
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela: нёльысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill: нёльӧ
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr: нёльлань
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Egr: нёльсянь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl: нёльӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Tra: нёльӧдті
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter: нёльӧдз
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom: нёльӧй
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Gen: нёльӧйлӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Abl: нёльӧйлысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Dat: нёльӧйлы
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Acc: нёльӧс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr+PxSg1: нёльнам
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Com: нёльӧйкӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Car: нёльӧйтӧг
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Cns: нёльӧйла
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: нёлям
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: нёльсьым
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: нёлям
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Apr: нёльӧйлань
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Egr: нёльӧйсянь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg1: нёльӧдым
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg1: нёльӧдзым
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom: нёльыд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Gen: нёльыдлӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Abl: нёльыдлысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Dat: нёльыдлы
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Acc: нёльтӧ
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr+PxSg2: нёльнад
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Com: нёльыдкӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Car: нёльыдтӧг
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Cns: нёльыдла
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg2: нёляд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: нёльсьыд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: нёляд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Apr: нёльыдлань
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Egr: нёльыдсянь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg2: нёльӧдыд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg2: нёльӧдзыд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom: нёльыс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Gen: нёльыслӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Abl: нёльыслысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Dat: нёльыслы
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Acc: нёльсӧ
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr+PxSg3: нёльнас
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Com: нёльыскӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Car: нёльыстӧг
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Cns: нёльысла
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: нёляс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: нёльсьыс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: нёляс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Apr: нёльыслань
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Egr: нёльыссянь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg3: нёльӧдыс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg3: нёльӧдзыс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl1+Nom: нёльным
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl1+Gen: нёльнымлӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl1+Abl: нёльнымлысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl1+Dat: нёльнымлы
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl1+Acc: нёльнымӧс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr+PxPl1: нёльнаным
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl1+Com: нёльнымкӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl1+Car: нёльнымтӧг
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl1+Cns: нёльнымла
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl1: нёляным
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: нёльсьыным
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: нёляным
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl1+Apr: нёльнымлань
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl1+Egr: нёльнымсянь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl1: нёльӧдным
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter+PxPl1: нёльӧдзным
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Nom: нёльныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Gen: нёльныдлӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Abl: нёльныдлысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Dat: нёльныдлы
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Acc: нёльнытӧ
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr+PxPl2: нёльнаныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Com: нёльныдкӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Car: нёльныдтӧг
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Cns: нёльныдла
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl2: нёляныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl2: нёльсьыныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: нёляныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Apr: нёльныдлань
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Egr: нёльныдсянь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl2: нёльӧдныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter+PxPl2: нёльӧдзныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Nom: нёльныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Gen: нёльныслӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Abl: нёльныслысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Dat: нёльныслы
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Acc: нёльнысӧ
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr+PxPl3: нёльнаныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Com: нёльныскӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Car: нёльныстӧг
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Cns: нёльнысла
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl3: нёляныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: нёльсьыныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: нёляныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Apr: нёльныслань
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Egr: нёльныссянь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl3: нёльӧдныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter+PxPl3: нёльӧдзныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom: нёльяс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Acc: [нёльяс, нёльяссӧ]
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen: нёльяслӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl: нёльяслысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat: нёльяслы
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr: нёльясӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com: нёльяскӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Car: нёльястӧг
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Cns: нёльясла
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine: нёльясын
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela: нёльясысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill: нёльясӧ
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr: нёльяслань
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Egr: нёльяссянь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl: нёльясӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter: нёльясӧдз
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Nom: нёльясӧй
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Gen: нёльясӧйлӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Abl: нёльясӧйлысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Dat: нёльясӧйлы
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Acc: нёльясӧс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr+PxSg1: нёльяснам
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Com: нёльясӧйкӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Car: нёльясӧйтӧг
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Cns: нёльясӧйла
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: нёльясам
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg1: нёльяссьым
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: нёльясам
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Apr: нёльясӧйлань
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Egr: нёльясӧйсянь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg1: нёльясӧдым
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg1: нёльясӧдзым
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom: нёльясыд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Gen: нёльясыдлӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Abl: нёльясыдлысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Dat: нёльясыдлы
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Acc: нёльястӧ
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr+PxSg2: нёльяснад
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Com: нёльясыдкӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Car: нёльясыдтӧг
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Cns: нёльясыдла
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg2: нёльясад
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg2: нёльяссьыд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: нёльясад
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Apr: нёльясыдлань
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Egr: нёльясыдсянь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg2: нёльясӧдыд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg2: нёльясӧдзыд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Nom: нёльясыс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Gen: нёльясыслӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Abl: нёльясыслысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Dat: нёльясыслы
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Acc: нёльяссӧ
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr+PxSg3: нёльяснас
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Com: нёльясыскӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Car: нёльясыстӧг
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Cns: нёльясысла
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg3: нёльясас
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: нёльяссьыс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: нёльясас
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Apr: нёльясыслань
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Egr: нёльясыссянь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg3: нёльясӧдыс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg3: нёльясӧдзыс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Nom: нёльясным
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Gen: нёльяснымлӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Abl: нёльяснымлысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Dat: нёльяснымлы
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Acc: нёльяснымӧс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr+PxPl1: нёльяснаным
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Com: нёльяснымкӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Car: нёльяснымтӧг
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Cns: нёльяснымла
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl1: нёльясаным
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: нёльяссьыным
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: нёльясаным
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Apr: нёльяснымлань
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Egr: нёльяснымсянь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl1: нёльясӧдным
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl1: нёльясӧдзным
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Nom: нёльясныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Gen: нёльясныдлӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Abl: нёльясныдлысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Dat: нёльясныдлы
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Acc: нёльяснытӧ
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr+PxPl2: нёльяснаныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Com: нёльясныдкӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Car: нёльясныдтӧг
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Cns: нёльясныдла
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: нёльясаныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: нёльяссьыныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: нёльясаныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Apr: нёльясныдлань
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Egr: нёльясныдсянь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl2: нёльясӧдныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl2: нёльясӧдзныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom: нёльясныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Gen: нёльясныслӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Abl: нёльясныслысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Dat: нёльясныслы
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Acc: нёльяснысӧ
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr+PxPl3: нёльяснаныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Com: нёльясныскӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Car: нёльясныстӧг
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Cns: нёльяснысла
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: нёльясаныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: нёльяссьыныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: нёльясаныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Apr: нёльясныслань
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Apr: нёльясныслань
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Egr: нёльясныссянь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl3: нёльясӧдныс
